District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

22-1304

Leaving District to give or receive challenge.

Repealed.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1328, ch. 854, § 854
Apr. 29, 2004, D.C. Law 15-154, § 3(f), 50 DCR 10996
1981 Ed., § 22-1104.
1973 Ed., § 22-1104.